California statutes. Penal Code
(h) (1) Upon resolution by the Napa County Board of Supervisors, custodial officers employed by the Napa County Department of Corrections are authorized to perform all of the following duties in a facility located in that county:

(A) Arrest a person without a warrant whenever the custodial officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed a misdemeanor or felony in the presence of the officer that is a violation of a statute or ordinance that the officer has the duty to enforce.

(B) Search property, cells, prisoners, or visitors.

(C) Conduct strip or body cavity searches of prisoners pursuant to Section 4030.

(D) Conduct searches and seizures pursuant to a duly issued warrant.

(E) Segregate prisoners.

(F) Classify prisoners for the purpose of housing or participation in supervised activities.

(2) This subdivision does not authorize the performance of any law enforcement activity involving any person other than an inmate or the inmate’s visitors.

(i) (1) Upon resolution by the County of Madera Board of Supervisors, custodial officers employed by the Madera County Department of Corrections are authorized to perform all of the following duties in a facility located in that county:

(A) Arrest a person without a warrant whenever the custodial officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed a misdemeanor or felony in the presence of the officer that is a violation of a statute or ordinance that the officer has the duty to enforce.

(B) Search property, cells, prisoners, or visitors.

(C) Conduct strip or body cavity searches of prisoners pursuant to Section 4030.

(D) Conduct searches and seizures pursuant to a duly issued warrant.

(E) Segregate prisoners.

(F) Classify prisoners for the purpose of housing or participation in supervised activities.

(2) This subdivision does not authorize the performance of any law enforcement activity involving any person other than an inmate or the inmate’s visitors.

(j) This section does not authorize a custodial officer to carry or possess a firearm when the officer is not on duty.

(k) It is the intent of the
 Legislature that this section, as it relates to Santa Clara, Madera, and Napa Counties, enumerate specific duties of custodial officers known as “correctional officers” in Santa Clara, Madera, and Napa Counties and to clarify the relationships of the correctional officers and deputy sheriffs in those counties. These duties are the same duties of the custodial officers prior to the date of enactment of Chapter 635 of the Statutes of 1999 pursuant to local rules and judicial decisions. It is further the intent of the Legislature that all issues regarding compensation for custodial officers remain subject to the collective bargaining process between the counties and the authorized bargaining representative for the custodial officers. However, this section does not assert that the duties of custodial officers are equivalent to the duties of deputy sheriffs and does not affect the ability of the county to negotiate pay that reflects the different duties of custodial officers and deputy
 sheriffs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 197.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

831.6.

(a) A transportation officer is a public officer, not a peace officer, appointed on a contract basis by a peace officer to transport a prisoner or prisoners.

(b) A transportation officer shall have the authority of a public officer, and shall have the right to carry or possess firearms, only while engaged in the transportation of a prisoner or prisoners for the duration of the contract.

(c) Each person described in this section as a transportation officer shall, prior to the transportation of any prisoner, have satisfactorily completed the training course specified in Section 832.

(d) A transportation officer may use reasonable force in establishing and maintaining custody of persons delivered to him or her by a peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   Effective July 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

831.7.

(a) As used in this section, a custody assistant is a person who is a full-time employee, not a peace officer, employed by the county sheriff’s department who assists peace officer personnel in maintaining order and security in a custody detention, court detention, or station jail facility of the sheriff’s department. A custody assistant is responsible for maintaining custody of prisoners and performs tasks related to the operation of a local detention facility used for the detention of persons usually pending arraignment or upon court order either for their own safekeeping or for the specific purpose of serving a sentence therein. Custody assistants of the sheriff’s department shall be employees of, and under the authority of, the sheriff.

(b) A custody assistant has no right to carry or possess firearms in the performance of his or her prescribed duties.

(c) Each person described in this section as a custody assistant shall satisfactorily complete a training course specified by the sheriff’s department. In addition, each person designated as a custody assistant shall satisfactorily meet the minimum selection and training standards prescribed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to Section 6035.

(d) A custody assistant may use reasonable force in establishing and maintaining custody of persons housed at a local detention facility, court detention facility, or station jail facility.

(e) Custody assistants employed by the county sheriff’s department are authorized to perform the following additional duties in a custody facility, court detention facility, or station jail facility:

(1) Assist in supervising the conduct of inmates in sleeping quarters, during meals and bathing, at recreation, and on work assignments.

(2) Assist in overseeing the work of, and instructing, a group of inmates assigned to various operational, maintenance, or other rehabilitative activities.

(3) Assist in the operation of main or dormitory control booths.

(4) Assist in processing inmates for court appearances.

(5) Control, or assist in the monitoring and control of, access to attorney rooms and visiting areas.

(6) Fingerprint, photograph, or operate livescan machines with respect to inmates, or assist in the fingerprinting or photographing of inmates.

(7) Obtain criminal history information relating to an inmate including any warrant or other hold, and update classification or housing information relating to an inmate, as necessary.

(8) Interview inmates and review records related to the classification process to determine the appropriate security level for an inmate or the eligibility of an inmate for transfer to another facility.

(9) Ensure compliance of a custody facility, court detention facility, or station jail facility with the provisions of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations, or with any other applicable legislative or judicial mandate.

(10) Assist in receiving and processing inmates in a sheriff’s station, court detention area, or type I jail facility.

(11) Secure inmates and their personal property and moneys as necessary in compliance with the rules and regulations of the sheriff’s department.

(12) Order, inspect, or serve meals to inmates.

(13) Maintain sanitary conditions within a custody facility, court detention facility, or station jail facility.

(14) Respond to public inquiries regarding any inmate.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, nothing in this section shall be construed to confer any authority upon a custody assistant except while on duty, or to grant any additional retirement benefits to persons employed within this classification.

(g) This section shall apply only in a county of the first class, as established by Sections 28020 and 28022 of the Government Code, but shall not be operative in a county until adopted by resolution of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 468, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Applicable as provided in subd. (g).)
-------------------------------------------

832.

(a) Every person described in this chapter as a peace officer shall satisfactorily complete an introductory training course prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. On or after July 1, 1989, satisfactory completion of the course shall be demonstrated by passage of an appropriate examination developed or approved by the commission. Training in the carrying and use of firearms shall not be required of a peace officer whose employing agency prohibits the use of firearms.

(b) (1) Every peace officer described in this chapter, prior to the exercise of the powers of a peace officer, shall have satisfactorily completed the training course described in
 subdivision (a).

(2) Every peace officer described in Section 13510 or in subdivision (a) of Section 830.2 may satisfactorily complete the training required by this section as part of the training prescribed pursuant to Section 13510.

(c) Persons described in this chapter as peace officers who have not satisfactorily completed the course described in subdivision (a), as specified in subdivision (b), shall not have the powers of a peace officer until they satisfactorily complete the course.

(d) A peace officer who, on March 4, 1972, possesses or is qualified to possess the basic certificate as awarded by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training is exempted from this section.

(e) (1) A person completing the training described in subdivision (a) who does not become employed as a peace officer within three years from the date of passing the examination described in subdivision (a), or who has a three-year or longer break in service as a peace officer, shall pass the examination described in subdivision (a) prior to the exercise of the powers of a peace officer, except for a person described in paragraph (2).

(2) The requirement in paragraph (1) does not apply to a person who meets any of the following requirements:

(A) Is returning to a management position that is at the second level of supervision or higher.

(B) Has successfully requalified for a basic course through the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(C) Has maintained proficiency through teaching the course described in subdivision (a).

(D) During the break in California service, was continuously employed as a peace officer in another state or at the federal level.

(E) Has previously met the requirements of subdivision (a), has been appointed as a peace officer under subdivision (c) of Section 830.1, and has been continuously employed as a custodial officer as defined in Section 831 or 831.5 by the agency making the peace officer appointment since completing the training prescribed in subdivision (a).

(f) The commission may charge appropriate fees for the examination required by subdivision (e), not to exceed actual costs.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may charge appropriate fees for the examination required by subdivision (a) to each applicant who is not sponsored by a local or other law enforcement agency, or is not a peace officer employed by, or under consideration for employment by, a state or local agency, department, or district, or is not a custodial officer as defined in Sections 831 and 831.5. The fees shall not exceed actual costs.

(h) (1) When evaluating a certification request from a probation department for a training course described in this section, the commission shall
 deem there to be an identifiable and unmet need for the training course.

(2) A probation department that is a certified provider of the training course described in this section shall not be required to offer the course to the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 546)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

832.05.

(a) Each state or local department or agency that employs peace officers shall utilize a person meeting the requirements set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1031 of the Government Code, applicable to emotional and mental examinations, for any emotional and mental evaluation done in the course of the department or agency’s screening of peace officer recruits or the evaluation of peace officers to determine their fitness for duty.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 777, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

832.1.

Any airport security officer, airport policeman, or airport special officer, regularly employed and paid by a city, county, city and county, or district who is a peace officer shall have completed a course of training relative to airport security approved by the Commission on Peace Officers Standards and Training. Any such airport officer so employed on the effective date of this section shall have completed the course of instruction required by this section by September 1, 1973. Any airport officer so employed after such effective date shall have completed the course of instruction within 90 days after such employment.

Any officer who has not satisfactorily completed such course within such prescribed time shall not continue to have the powers of a peace officer until they have satisfactorily completed such course.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 168.)
-------------------------------------------

832.2.

Every school police reserve officer, as described in Section 38000 of the Education Code, shall complete a course of training approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training relating directly to the role of school police reserve officers.

The school police reserve officer training course shall address guidelines and procedures for reporting offenses to other law enforcement agencies that deal with violence on campus and other school related matters, as determined by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 745, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

832.25.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all welfare fraud investigators or inspectors who are appointed as peace officers pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 830.35 on or after January 1, 2001, shall attend and complete a specialized investigators basic course approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training within one year of being hired as a welfare investigator or inspector. Any welfare fraud investigator or inspector appointed prior to January 1, 2001, shall not be required to attend and complete the training required by this section, provided that he or she has been continuously employed in that capacity prior to January 1, 2001, by the county that made the appointment.

(b) Any investigator or inspector who possesses a valid basic peace officer certificate as awarded by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training or who has successfully completed the regular basic course certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training basic course within three years prior to appointment shall be exempt from the training requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 633, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

832.3.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), any sheriff, undersheriff, or deputy sheriff of a county, any police officer of a city, and any police officer of a district authorized by statute to maintain a police department, who is first employed after January 1, 1975, shall successfully complete a course of training prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training before exercising the powers of a peace officer, except while participating as a trainee in a supervised field training program approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. Each police chief, or any other person in charge of a local law enforcement agency, appointed on or after January 1, 1999, as a condition of continued employment, shall complete the course of training pursuant to this subdivision within two years of
 appointment. The training course for a sheriff, an undersheriff, and a deputy sheriff of a county, and a police chief and a police officer of a city or any other local law enforcement agency, shall be the same.

(b) For the purpose of ensuring competent peace officers and standardizing the training required in subdivision (a), the commission shall develop a testing program, including standardized tests that enable (1) comparisons between presenters of the training and (2) assessments of trainee achievement. The trainees’ test scores shall be used only for the purposes enumerated in this subdivision and those research purposes as shall be approved in advance by the commission. The commission shall take all steps necessary to maintain the confidentiality of the test scores, test items, scoring keys, and other examination data used in the testing program required by this subdivision. The commission shall determine the minimum passing score for each
 test and the conditions for retesting students who fail. Passing these tests shall be required for successful completion of the training required in subdivision (a). Presenters approved by the commission to provide the training required in subdivision (a) shall administer the standardized tests or, at the commission’s option, shall facilitate the commission’s administration of the standardized tests to all trainees.

(c) Community colleges may give preference in enrollment to employed law enforcement trainees who shall complete training as prescribed by this section. At least 15 percent of each presentation shall consist of non-law-enforcement trainees if they are available. Preference should only be given when the trainee could not complete the course within the time required by statute, and only when no other training program is reasonably available. Average daily attendance for these courses shall be reported for state aid.

(d) Prior to July 1, 1987, the commission shall make a report to the Legislature on academy proficiency testing scores. This report shall include an evaluation of the correlation between academy proficiency test scores and performance as a peace officer.

(e) (1) Any deputy sheriff described in subdivision (c) of Section 830.1 shall be exempt from the training requirements specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) as long as his or her assignments remain custodial related.

(2) Deputy sheriffs described in subdivision (c) of Section 830.1 shall complete the training for peace officers pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 832, and within 120 days after the date of employment, shall complete the training required by the Board of State and Community Corrections for custodial personnel pursuant to Section
 6035, and the training required for custodial personnel of local detention facilities pursuant to Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Deputy sheriffs described in subdivision (c) of Section 830.1 shall complete the course of training pursuant to subdivision (a) prior to being reassigned from custodial assignments to duties with responsibility for the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the criminal laws of this state. A deputy sheriff who has completed the course of training pursuant to subdivision (a) and has been hired as a deputy sheriff described in subdivision (c) of Section 830.1 shall be eligible to be reassigned from custodial assignments to duties with the responsibility for the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the criminal laws of this state within three years of completing the training
 pursuant to subdivision (a). A deputy sheriff shall be eligible for reassignment within five years of having completed the training pursuant to subdivision (a) without having to complete a requalification for the regular basic course provided that all of the following are satisfied:

(A) The deputy sheriff remains continuously employed by the same department in which the deputy sheriff is being reassigned from custodial assignments to duties with the responsibility for the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the criminal laws of this state.

(B) The deputy sheriff maintains the perishable skills training required by the commission for peace officers assigned to duties with the responsibility for the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the criminal laws of this state.

(f) Any school police officer first employed by a K–12 public school district or California Community College district after July 1, 1999, shall successfully complete a basic course of training as prescribed by subdivision (a) before exercising the powers of a peace officer. A school police officer shall not be subject to this subdivision while participating as a trainee in a supervised field training program approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(g) The commission shall prepare a specialized course of instruction for the training of school peace officers, as defined in Section 830.32, to meet the unique safety needs of a school environment. This course is intended to supplement any other training requirements.

(h) Any school peace officer first employed by a K–12 public school district or California Community College district before July
 1, 1999, shall successfully complete the specialized course of training prescribed in subdivision (g) no later than July 1, 2002. Any school police officer first employed by a K–12 public school district or California Community College district after July 1, 1999, shall successfully complete the specialized course of training prescribed in subdivision (g) within two years of the date of first employment.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 228) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.   (AB 1888)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

832.4.

(a) Any undersheriff or deputy sheriff of a county, any police officer of a city, and any police officer of a district authorized by statute to maintain a police department, who is first employed after January 1, 1974, and is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the criminal laws of this state, shall obtain the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training within 18 months of his or her employment in order to continue to exercise the powers of a peace officer after the expiration of the 18-month period.

(b) Every peace officer listed in subdivision (a) of Section 830.1, except a sheriff, or elected marshal, or a deputy sheriff described in subdivision (c) of Section 830.1, who is employed after January 1, 1988, shall obtain the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training upon completion of probation, but in no case later than 24 months after his or her employment, in order to continue to exercise the powers of a peace officer after the expiration of the 24-month period.

Deputy sheriffs described in subdivision (c) of Section 830.1 shall obtain the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training within 24 months after being reassigned from custodial duties to general law enforcement duties.

In those cases where the probationary period established by the employing agency is 24 months, the peace officers described in this subdivision may continue to exercise the powers of a peace officer for an additional three-month period to allow for the processing of the certification application.

(c) Each police chief, or any other person in charge of a local law enforcement agency, appointed on or after January 1, 1999, as a condition of continued employment, shall obtain the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training within two years of appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 366.5.   Effective September 28, 1998.   Operative January 1, 1999, by Sec. 496 of Ch. 931.)
-------------------------------------------

832.5.

(a) (1) Each department or agency in this state that employs peace officers shall establish a procedure to investigate complaints by members of the public against the personnel of these departments or agencies, and shall make a written description of the procedure available to the public.

(2) Each department or agency that employs custodial officers, as defined in Section 831.5, may establish a procedure to investigate complaints by members of the public against those custodial officers employed by these departments or agencies, provided, however, that any procedure so established shall comply with the provisions of this section and with the provisions of
 Section 832.7.

(b) Complaints and any reports or findings relating to these complaints, including all complaints and any reports currently in the possession of the department or agency, shall be retained for a period of no less than 5 years for records where there was not a sustained finding of misconduct and for not less than 15 years where there was a sustained finding of misconduct. A record shall not be destroyed while a request related to that record is being processed or any process or litigation to determine whether the record is subject to release is ongoing. All complaints retained pursuant to this subdivision may be maintained either in the peace or custodial officer’s general personnel file or in a separate file designated by the department or agency as provided by department or agency policy, in accordance with
 all applicable requirements of law. However, prior to any official determination regarding promotion, transfer, or disciplinary action by an officer’s employing department or agency, the complaints described by subdivision (c) shall be removed from the officer’s general personnel file and placed in a separate file designated by the department or agency, in accordance with all applicable requirements of law.

(c) Complaints by members of the public that are determined by the peace or custodial officer’s employing agency to be frivolous, as defined in Section 128.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or unfounded or exonerated, or any portion of a complaint that is determined to be frivolous, unfounded, or exonerated, shall not be maintained in that officer’s general personnel file. However, these complaints shall be retained in other,
 separate files that shall be deemed personnel records for purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and Section 1043 of the Evidence Code.

(1) Management of the peace or custodial officer’s employing agency shall have access to the files described in this subdivision.

(2) Management of the peace or custodial officer’s employing agency shall not use the complaints contained in these separate files for punitive or promotional purposes except as permitted by subdivision (f) of Section 3304 of the Government Code.

(3) Management of the peace or custodial officer’s employing agency may identify any officer who is subject to the complaints maintained
 in these files which require counseling or additional training. However, if a complaint is removed from the officer’s personnel file, any reference in the personnel file to the complaint or to a separate file shall be deleted.

(d) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “General personnel file” means the file maintained by the agency containing the primary records specific to each peace or custodial officer’s employment, including evaluations, assignments, status changes, and imposed discipline.

(2) “Unfounded” means that the investigation clearly established that the allegation is not true.

(3) “Exonerated” means that the investigation clearly
 established that the actions of the peace or custodial officer that formed the basis for the complaint are not violations of law or department policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 125.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

832.55.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 13510.1, peace officers described in Section 830.83 shall be subject to the applicable requirements of, the certification program for peace officers described in Section 13510.1.

(b) (1) Every peace officer described in Section 830.83 shall obtain the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training upon completion of a 12-month probationary period, but in no case later than 24 months after their employment, in order to continue to exercise the powers of a peace officer after the expiration of the 24-month period.

(2) If the probationary period established by the employing
 agency is 24 months, a peace officer described in this subdivision may continue to exercise the powers of a peace officer for an additional 3-month period to allow for the processing of the certification application.

(c) Each police chief, or any other person in charge of a qualified entity, as defined in Section 11073, as a condition of continued authority as a peace officer, shall obtain the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training within two years of appointment.

(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not apply to a police officer, public safety officer, or investigator described in Section 830.83 who currently possesses a valid and active basic certificate.

(e) This section shall become operative only upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purposes of this
 section.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 3.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

832.6.

(a) Every person deputized or appointed, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 830.6, shall have the powers of a peace officer only when the person is any of the following:

(1) A level I reserve officer deputized or appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) or subdivision (b) of Section 830.6 and assigned to the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the laws of this state, whether or not working alone, and the person has completed the basic training course for deputy sheriffs and police officers prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. For level I reserve officers appointed prior to January 1, 1997, the basic training requirement shall be the
 course that was prescribed at the time of their appointment. Reserve officers appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall satisfy the continuing professional training requirement prescribed by the commission.

(2) (A) A level II reserve officer assigned to the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the laws of this state while under the immediate supervision of a peace officer who has completed the basic training course for deputy sheriffs and police officers prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, and the level II reserve officer has completed the course required by Section 832 and any other training prescribed by the commission.

(B) Level II reserve officers appointed pursuant to this paragraph may be assigned, without immediate supervision, to those limited duties that are authorized for level III reserve officers pursuant to paragraph (3). Reserve officers appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall satisfy the continuing professional training requirement prescribed by the commission.

(3) Level III reserve officers may be deployed and are authorized only to carry out limited support duties not requiring general law enforcement powers in their routine performance. Those limited duties shall include traffic control, security at parades and sporting events, report taking, evidence transportation, parking enforcement, and other duties that are not likely to result in physical arrests. Level III reserve
 officers, while assigned these duties, shall be supervised in the accessible vicinity by a level I reserve officer or a full-time, regular peace officer employed by a law enforcement agency authorized to have reserve officers. Level III reserve officers may transport prisoners without immediate supervision. Those persons shall have completed the training required under Section 832 and any other training prescribed by the commission for those persons.

(4) A person assigned to the prevention and detection of a particular crime or crimes or to the detection or apprehension of a particular individual or individuals while working under the supervision of a California peace officer in a county adjacent to the
 state border who possesses a basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, and the person is a law enforcement officer who is regularly employed by a local or state law enforcement agency in an adjoining state and has completed the basic training required for peace officers in his or her state.

(5) (A) For purposes of this section, a reserve officer who has previously satisfied the training requirements pursuant to this
 section and has served as a level I or II reserve officer within the three-year period prior to the date of a new appointment shall be deemed to remain qualified as to the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training requirements if that reserve officer accepts a new appointment at the same or lower level with another law enforcement agency. If the reserve officer has more than a three-year break in service, he or she shall satisfy current training requirements.

(B) This training shall fully satisfy any other training requirements required by law,
 including those specified in Section 832.

(C) In no case shall a peace officer of an adjoining state provide services within a California jurisdiction during any period in which the regular law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction is involved in a labor dispute.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person who is issued a level I reserve officer certificate before January 1, 1981, shall have the full powers and duties of a peace
 officer, as provided by Section
 830.1,
 if so designated by local ordinance or, if the local agency is not authorized to act by ordinance, by resolution, either individually or by class, if the appointing authority determines the person is qualified to perform general law enforcement duties by reason of the person’s training and experience. Persons who were qualified to be issued the level I reserve officer certificate before January 1, 1981, and who state in writing under penalty of perjury that they applied for, but were not issued, the certificate before January 1, 1981, may be issued the certificate before July 1, 1984. For purposes of
 this section, certificates that are issued shall be deemed to have the full force and effect of any level I reserve officer certificate issued prior to January 1, 1981.

(c) In carrying out this section, the commission:

(1) May use proficiency testing to satisfy reserve training standards.

(2) Shall provide for convenient training to remote areas in the state.

(3) Shall establish a professional certificate for reserve
 officers, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and may establish a professional certificate for reserve officers, as defined in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a).

(4) Shall facilitate the voluntary transition of reserve officers to regular officers with no unnecessary redundancy between the training required for level I and level II reserve officers.

(d) In carrying out paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (c), the commission may
 establish and levy appropriate fees, provided the fees do not exceed the cost for administering the respective services. These fees shall be deposited in the State Penalty
 Fund established by Section 1464.

(e) The commission shall include an amount in its annual budget request to carry out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 16.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

832.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the personnel records of peace officers and custodial officers and records maintained by a state or local agency pursuant to Section 832.5, or information obtained from these records, are confidential and shall not be disclosed in any criminal or civil proceeding except by discovery pursuant to Sections 1043 and 1046 of the Evidence Code. This section does not apply to investigations or proceedings concerning the conduct of peace officers or custodial officers, or an agency or department that employs those officers, conducted by a grand jury, a district attorney’s office, the Attorney General’s office, or the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and
 Training, or a civilian oversight board or commission for a law enforcement agency established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25303.7 of the Government Code or other duly enacted municipal or county ordinance.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), Section 7923.600 of the Government Code, or any other law, the following peace officer or custodial officer personnel records and records maintained by a state or local agency shall not be confidential and shall be made available for public inspection pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code):

(A) A record relating to the report, investigation, or findings of any of the following:

(i) An incident involving the discharge of a firearm at a person by a peace officer or custodial officer.

(ii) An incident involving the use of force against a person by a peace officer or custodial officer that resulted in death or in great bodily injury.

(iii) A sustained finding involving a complaint that alleges unreasonable or excessive force.

(iv) A sustained finding that an officer failed to intervene against another officer using force that is clearly unreasonable or excessive.

(B) (i) Any record relating to an incident in which a sustained finding was made by any law
 enforcement agency or oversight agency that a peace officer or custodial officer engaged in sexual assault involving a member of the public.

(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “sexual assault” means the commission or attempted initiation of a sexual act with a member of the public by means of force, threat, coercion, extortion, offer of leniency or other official favor, or under the color of authority. For purposes of this definition, the propositioning for or commission of any sexual act while on duty is considered a sexual assault.

(iii) As used in this subparagraph, “member of the public” means any person not employed by the officer’s employing agency and includes any participant in a cadet, explorer, or other youth program affiliated with the agency.
